Utah statutes.
67-19-14.4.   Unused Sick Leave Retirement Program II -- Creation --
Remuneration upon eligibility for allowance -- Medical expense account after
retirement.
(1) (a)  There is created the "Unused Sick Leave Retirement Program II."
(b)  An agency shall offer the Unused Sick Leave Retirement Option Program II
to an employee who is eligible to receive a retirement allowance in accordance
with Title 49, Utah State Retirement and Insurance Benefit Act.
(c)  Beginning January 1, 2011, an employee who is participating in the Unused
Sick Leave Retirement Program I under Section 67-19-14.2 may make a one-time
and irrevocable election to transfer all unused sick leave hours which shall
include all converted sick leave hours under Section 67-19-14.1 for use under
the Unused Sick Leave Retirement Program II under this section.
(2) (a)  The Unused Sick Leave Retirement Program II provides that upon
becoming eligible to receive a retirement allowance an employee who is
employed by the state on or after January 1, 2006, shall receive remuneration
for the employee's unused accumulated sick leave and converted sick leave
accrued beginning January 1, 2006 in accordance with this section as follows:
(i)  subject to federal requirements and limitations, a contribution at the
employee's rate of pay at the time of retirement for 25% of the employee's
unused accumulated sick leave and converted sick leave shall be transferred
directly to the employee's defined contribution plan qualified under Section
401(k) of the Internal Revenue Code which is sponsored by the Utah State
Retirement Board; and
(ii)  participation in a benefit plan that provides for reimbursement for
medical expenses using monies deposited at the employee's rate of pay at the
time of retirement from remaining unused accumulated sick leave and converted
sick leave balances.
(b)  If the amount calculated under Subsection (2)(a)(i) exceeds the federal
contribution limitations, the amount representing the excess shall be
deposited under Subsection (2)(a)(ii).
(c)  An employee's rate of pay at the time of retirement for purposes of
Subsection (2)(a)(ii) may not be less than the average rate of pay of state
employees who retired in the same retirement system under Title 49, Utah State
Retirement and Insurance Benefit Act, during the previous calendar year.
(3)  The Utah State Retirement Office shall develop and maintain a program to
provide a benefit plan that provides for reimbursement for medical expenses
under Subsection (2)(a)(ii) with:
(a)  monies deposited under Subsection (2)(a)(ii); and
(b)  accrued earnings.
